Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-567.05
Districts organized; elections held; proceedings of directors; taxes levied; validated.

All districts heretofore organized under the authority of Chapter 46, article 5, Revised Statutes Supplement, 1949, and all elections and proceedings heretofore held and taken by the boards of directors of the districts, including the levy of taxes pursuant to the provisions hereof, be and the same are hereby ratified, validated and confirmed.

Laws 1951, c. 151, § 18, p. 615.